Utah statutes.
57-19-23.   Prosecution.

The director may refer any available evidence concerning violations of this chapter or of any rule or order under this chapter to the attorney general or the proper prosecuting attorney, who may, in his discretion, with or without such a referral, institute the appropriate civil or criminal proceedings under this chapter.

